Oklahoma, session 2026, HB4362.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 4010 of Title 56, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
The Oklahoma Health Care Authority shall apply for a 1115 waiver
with the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services to expand
coverage for medical respite and supportive housing.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.

60-2-14770 TJ 12/12/25



Req. No. 14770 Page 1